apertium-deu.deu.dix
<pardef n="B/and__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>ändern</l>    <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änder</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änder</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änder</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>      <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>andes</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ands</l>      <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="B/and__n_nt_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ändern</l>    <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änder</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änder</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änder</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>      <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>andes</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ands</l>      <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="B/ank__n_f"><!-- FIXME split meanings -->
  <e>       <p><l>anken</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anken</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>änken</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anken</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anken</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änke</l>      <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änke</l>      <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änke</l>      <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="B/ank__n_f_lower"><!-- FIXME split meanings -->
  <e>       <p><l>anken</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anken</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>änken</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anken</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anken</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änke</l>      <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änke</l>      <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änke</l>      <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="B/art__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ärten</l>     <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärte</l>      <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärte</l>      <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärte</l>      <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arte</l>      <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>artes</l>     <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>art</l>       <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>art</l>       <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>art</l>       <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arts</l>      <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>art</l>       <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="B/art__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ärten</l>     <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärte</l>      <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärte</l>      <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärte</l>      <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arte</l>      <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>artes</l>     <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>art</l>       <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>art</l>       <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>art</l>       <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arts</l>      <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>art</l>       <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Band">            <i>B</i><par n="B/and__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Band">            <i>b</i><par n="B/and__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Bank">            <i>B</i><par n="B/ank__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Bank">            <i>b</i><par n="B/ank__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Bart">            <i>B</i><par n="B/art__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Bart">            <i>b</i><par n="B/art__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Bundesland">      <i>Bundesl</i><par n="B/and__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Bundesland">      <i>bundesl</i><par n="B/and__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Gewand">          <i>Gew</i><par n="B/and__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Gewand">          <i>gew</i><par n="B/and__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Kreuzband">       <i>Kreuzb</i><par n="B/and__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Kreuzband">       <i>kreuzb</i><par n="B/and__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Kulturland">      <i>Kulturl</i><par n="B/and__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Kulturland">      <i>kulturl</i><par n="B/and__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Land">            <i>L</i><par n="B/and__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Land">            <i>l</i><par n="B/and__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Niemandsland">    <i>Niemandsl</i><par n="B/and__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Niemandsland">    <i>niemandsl</i><par n="B/and__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Pfand">           <i>Pf</i><par n="B/and__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Pfand">           <i>pf</i><par n="B/and__n_nt_lower"/></e>
